Utah statutes.
23-14-2.1.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

The Division of Wildlife Resources shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative proceedings.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

